Utah statutes.
47-1-8.   Permanent injunction -- Fine.
Whenever a permanent injunction issues against any person for maintaining a
nuisance as provided, or against any owner or agent of the building kept or
used for the maintenance of the nuisance, all parties found guilty of
maintaining the nuisance, or assisting to maintain the nuisance by furnishing
or letting the building for the maintenance thereof, or otherwise, shall each
be punished by a fine of not more than the maximum fine for a class A
misdemeanor.  The payment of the fine does not relieve the person or persons
from any other penalties provided by law.
